Maryland, session 2025, HB0465.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
9–109.
(D) (1) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT ARE
INTENDED TO REDUCE OR MITIGATE THE EFFECTS OF PROBLEM GAMBLING.
(2) THE REGULATIONS SHALL:
(I) ESTABLISH A VOLUNTARY EXCLUSION LIST OF INDIVIDUALS
WITH GAMBLING PROBLEMS WHO HAVE REQUESTED TO BE EXCLUDED FROM THE
STATE LOTTERY, A GAME, OR A FACILITY THAT OFFERS A GAME AUTHORIZED UNDER
THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(II) PROVIDE A SIMPLE MECHANISM FOR AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS
SOBER AND INFORMED TO REQUEST PLACEMENT ON THE VOLUNTARY EXCLUSION
LIST FOR A SPECIFIED PERIOD OF TIME.
(3) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE THE CONTACT INFORMATION OF AN INDIVIDUAL WHO
REQUESTS TO BE PLACED ON THE VOLUNTARY EXCLUSION LIST TO THE MARYLAND
CENTER FOR EXCELLENCE ON PROBLEM GAMBLING FOR THE PURPOSE OF
PROVIDING THE INDIVIDUAL INFORMATION ABOUT FREE AND CONFIDENTIAL
RESPONSIBLE GAMBLING ASSISTANCE.
(II) IF AN INDIVIDUAL AFFIRMATIVELY DECLINES TO HAVE THE
INDIVIDUAL’S CONTACT INFORMATION PROVIDED TO THE MARYLAND CENTER FOR
EXCELLENCE ON PROBLEM GAMBLING, THE COMMISSION MAY NOT PROVIDE THE
CONTACT INFORMATION TO THE CENTER.
9–1A–24.
(e) (1) By regulation, the Commission shall adopt measures that are intended
to reduce or mitigate the effects of problem gambling.
(2) (I) The regulations shall:

HOUSE BILL 465 3
[(i)] 1. [include establishment of] ESTABLISH a voluntary
exclusion list of individuals with gambling problems who have requested to be excluded
from any video lottery operation licensed under this subtitle; and
[(ii)] 2. provide a simple mechanism for an individual who is sober
and informed to request placement on the voluntary exclusion list for a specified period of
time.
(II) 1. SUBJECT TO SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 2 OF THIS
SUBPARAGRAPH, THE COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE THE CONTACT INFORMATION
OF AN INDIVIDUAL WHO REQUESTS TO BE PLACED ON THE VOLUNTARY EXCLUSION
LIST TO THE MARYLAND CENTER FOR EXCELLENCE ON PROBLEM GAMBLING FOR
THE PURPOSE OF PROVIDING THE INDIVIDUAL INFORMATION ABOUT FREE AND
CONFIDENTIAL RESPONSIBLE GAMBLING ASSISTANCE.
2. IF AN INDIVIDUAL AFFIRMATIVELY DECLINES TO
HAVE THE INDIVIDUAL’S CONTACT INFORMATION PROVIDED TO THE MARYLAND
CENTER FOR EXCELLENCE ON PROBLEM GAMBLING, THE COMMISSION MAY NOT
PROVIDE THE CONTACT INFORMATION TO THE CENTER.
(3) A video lottery operation licensee may not permit an individual on the
voluntary exclusion list to enter into the video lottery facility or to play a video lottery
terminal.
(4) The Commission may impose sanctions on a licensee in accordance with
this subtitle if the licensee knowingly fails to exclude from the premises of the licensee an
individual on the voluntary exclusion list.
9–1D–02.
(a) (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of Title 12 of the Criminal Law Article
or any other title, and except as provided under [subsection (b) of this section] PARAGRAPH
(2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, the prohibitions against betting, wagering, and gambling do
not apply to participation in a fantasy competition.
[(b)] (2) A person may not operate a kiosk or machine that offers fantasy
competition to the public in a place of business physically located in the State.
(B) (1) A PERSON UNDER THE AGE OF 21 YEARS MAY NOT PARTICIPATE
IN A FANTASY COMPETITION.
(2) A FANTASY COMPETITION OPERATOR MAY NOT OFFER A FANTASY
COMPETITION OR SERVICES IN CONNECTION WITH A FANTASY COMPETITION FOR
WHICH THERE IS AN ENTRY FEE TO A PERSON THAT IS UNDER THE AGE OF 21 YEARS.

HOUSE BILL 465
9–1D–05.
(a) The Commission shall adopt regulations THAT ESTABLISH:
(1) (I) A VOLUNTARY EXCLUSION LIST OF INDIVIDUALS WITH
GAMBLING PROBLEMS WHO HAVE REQUESTED TO BE EXCLUDED FROM
PARTICIPATING IN ANY FANTASY COMPETITION AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE; AND
(II) A SIMPLE MECHANISM FOR AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS SOBER
AND INFORMED TO REQUEST PLACEMENT ON THE VOLUNTARY EXCLUSION LIST FOR
A SPECIFIED PERIOD OF TIME; AND
(2) ANY OTHER REGULATION NECESSARY to carry out the provisions of
this subtitle.
(b) (1) [The regulations adopted under this section may include requirements
for the establishment of a voluntary exclusion list] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE THE CONTACT INFORMATION OF
AN INDIVIDUAL WHO REQUESTS TO BE PLACED ON THE VOLUNTARY EXCLUSION LIST
ESTABLISHED BY REGULATION UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1)(I) OF THIS SECTION TO
THE MARYLAND CENTER FOR EXCELLENCE ON PROBLEM GAMBLING FOR THE
PURPOSE OF PROVIDING THE INDIVIDUAL INFORMATION ABOUT FREE AND
CONFIDENTIAL RESPONSIBLE GAMBLING ASSISTANCE.
(2) IF AN INDIVIDUAL AFFIRMATIVELY DECLINES TO HAVE THE
INDIVIDUAL’S CONTACT INFORMATION PROVIDED TO THE MARYLAND CENTER FOR
EXCELLENCE ON PROBLEM GAMBLING, THE COMMISSION MAY NOT PROVIDE THE
CONTACT INFORMATION TO THE CENTER.
9–1E–04.
(b) In accordance with this subtitle, the Commission shall adopt regulations that
establish:
(6) standards, procedures, and rules that govern the conduct of sports
wagering, including:
(xiii) establishing a list of individuals who are to be mandatorily
excluded or ejected by a sports wagering licensee from any facility or website operated by a
sports wagering licensee; [and]

HOUSE BILL 465 5
(7) A VOLUNTARY EXCLUSION LIST OF INDIVIDUALS WITH GAMBLING
PROBLEMS WHO HAVE REQUESTED TO BE EXCLUDED FROM PARTICIPATING IN
SPORTS WAGERING AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE;
(8) A SIMPLE MECHANISM FOR AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS SOBER AND
INFORMED TO REQUEST PLACEMENT ON THE VOLUNTARY EXCLUSION LIST FOR A
SPECIFIED PERIOD OF TIME; AND
[(7)] (9) any other regulation necessary to carry out the provisions of this
subtitle.
(D) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE THE CONTACT INFORMATION OF AN INDIVIDUAL WHO
REQUESTS TO BE PLACED ON THE VOLUNTARY EXCLUSION LIST REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B)(7) OF THIS SECTION TO THE MARYLAND CENTER FOR
EXCELLENCE ON PROBLEM GAMBLING FOR THE PURPOSE OF PROVIDING THE
INDIVIDUAL INFORMATION ABOUT FREE AND CONFIDENTIAL RESPONSIBLE
GAMBLING ASSISTANCE.
(2) IF AN INDIVIDUAL AFFIRMATIVELY DECLINES TO HAVE THE
INDIVIDUAL’S CONTACT INFORMATION PROVIDED TO THE MARYLAND CENTER FOR
EXCELLENCE ON PROBLEM GAMBLING, THE COMMISSION MAY NOT PROVIDE THE
CONTACT INFORMATION TO THE CENTER.
9–1E–09.
(F) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “PROPOSITION BET” MEANS A WAGER ON AN
INDIVIDUAL ACTION, STATISTIC, OCCURRENCE, OR NONOCCURRENCE, WHETHER
RELATED TO AN INDIVIDUAL PLAYER OR TEAM, THE OUTCOME OF WHICH IS NOT
DIRECTLY CONNECTED TO THE FINAL OUTCOME OR FINAL SCORE OF A SPORTING
EVENT.
(2) (I) A SPORTS WAGERING LICENSEE MAY NOT OFFER OR
ACCEPT A WAGER ON A PLAYER–SPECIFIC PROPOSITION BET ON A PARTICIPANT IN
A COLLEGIATE SPORTS OR ATHLETIC EVENT.
(II) AN INDIVIDUAL MAY NOT PLACE A WAGER ON A
PLAYER–SPECIFIC PROPOSITION BET ON A PARTICIPANT IN A COLLEGIATE SPORTS
OR ATHLETIC EVENT.
9–1E–11.
(a) An individual may not wager on a sporting event and a sports wagering
licensee may not accept a wager from an individual on a sporting event if the individual:

HOUSE BILL 465
(7) is identified on a mandatory or voluntary sports wagering exclusion list
maintained by the Commission;
(b) For online sports wagering, a mobile sports wagering licensee shall:
(1) have in place technical and operational measures to prevent access by
individuals who are underage or physically located outside the State, including:
(i) age verification procedures, which may require the use of a
reputable independent third party that is in the business of verifying an individual’s
personally identifiable information; [and]
(ii) AGE AND IDENTITY VERIFICATION PROCEDURES, THAT
REQUIRE THE VERIFICATION OF AN INDIVIDUAL’S AGE AND IDENTITY AT THE TIME
THE INDIVIDUAL ESTABLISHES A SPORTS WAGERING ACCOUNT AND PERIODICALLY
REQUIRES REVERIFICATION OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S IDENTITY; AND
(III) the use of geolocation technology to verify a bettor’s geographic
location;
(2) include on its online sports wagering website a description of the
possible repercussions for an underage or out–of–state bettor, which may include
immediate stoppage of play, account closure, and forfeiture and confiscation of winnings;
[and]
(3) establish procedures to prevent prohibited individuals from wagering
on sporting events;
(4) CAUSE THE WORDS “IF YOU OR SOMEONE YOU KNOW HAS A
GAMBLING PROBLEM AND WANTS HELP, CALL 1–800–GAMBLER” OR SOME
COMPARABLE LANGUAGE APPROVED BY THE COMMISSION TO BE DISPLAYED
PROMINENTLY AT LOG–ON AND LOG–OFF TIMES TO ANY INDIVIDUAL VISITING OR
LOGGED ONTO AN ONLINE SPORTS WAGERING PLATFORM;
(5) REQUIRE AN ONLINE SPORTS WAGERING ACCOUNT HOLDER TO
ESTABLISH A LIMIT ON THE AMOUNT OF MONEY DEPOSITED WITHIN A SPECIFIED
PERIOD OF TIME AND THE LENGTH OF TIME THE ACCOUNT HOLDER WILL BE UNABLE
TO PARTICIPATE IN SPORTS WAGERING AND MAKE ADDITIONAL DEPOSITS IF THE
ACCOUNT HOLDER REACHES THE ESTABLISHED DEPOSIT LIMIT;
(6) PROVIDE A MECHANISM BY WHICH AN ONLINE SPORTS WAGERING
ACCOUNT HOLDER MAY ESTABLISH A TEMPORARY SUSPENSION OF ONLINE SPORTS
WAGERING ACTIVITY THROUGH THE ACCOUNT FOR ANY NUMBER OF HOURS OR
DAYS;

HOUSE BILL 465 7
(7) PROHIBIT THE USE OF CREDIT CARDS FOR ANY ONLINE SPORTS
WAGERING–RELATED TRANSACTIONS; AND
(8) (I) CAUSE THE DISPLAY OF A PROBLEM GAMBLING
DISCLOSURE CONCERNING THE RISKS ASSOCIATED WITH GAMBLING AND THE
SUPPORT AVAILABLE TO PROBLEM GAMBLERS AT ACCOUNT LOGIN;
(II) REQUIRE AN INDIVIDUAL TO CERTIFY THAT THE
INDIVIDUAL HAS READ THE DISCLOSURE DESCRIBED UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS ITEM
BEFORE ESTABLISHING AN ONLINE SPORTS WAGERING ACCOUNT; AND
(III) REQUIRE EACH USER TO CERTIFY ON A MONTHLY BASIS
THAT THE USER HAS READ THE DISCLOSURE DESCRIBED UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS
ITEM.
(F) IF A SUSPENSION OF SPORTS WAGERING ACTIVITY UNDER SUBSECTION
(B)(6) OF THIS SECTION IS IMPOSED BY THE ACCOUNT HOLDER FOR AT LEAST 72
HOURS, THE SPORTS WAGERING LICENSEE MAY NOT SEND
SPORTS WAGERING–RELATED ELECTRONIC MAIL TO THE ACCOUNT HOLDER UNTIL
THE SUSPENSION EXPIRES.
(G) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
SPORTS WAGERING LICENSEE SHALL PROVIDE A MECHANISM BY WHICH AN
ACCOUNT HOLDER MAY PERIODICALLY CHANGE THE CONTROLS ON SPORTS
WAGERING ACTIVITY IMPOSED BY THE ACCOUNT HOLDER UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) IF THE ACCOUNT IS SUSPENDED BY THE ACCOUNT HOLDER
UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(6) OF THIS SECTION, THE ACCOUNT HOLDER MAY NOT
CHANGE THE CONTROLS ON SPORTS WAGERING ACTIVITY UNTIL THE SUSPENSION
EXPIRES.
(3) IF AN INDIVIDUAL SEEKS TO INCREASE THE LIMIT ON THE
AMOUNT OF MONEY THAT THE INDIVIDUAL MAY DEPOSIT WITHIN A PERIOD OF TIME
SPECIFIED UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(5) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE SPORTS
WAGERING LICENSEE MAY NOT REFLECT THE INCREASED LIMIT FOR AT LEAST 24
HOURS OR UNTIL AFTER THE TIME PERIOD OF THE PREVIOUS LIMIT HAS EXPIRED,
WHICHEVER IS LATER.
(H) NOTWITHSTANDING A TEMPORARY SUSPENSION OF SPORTS WAGERING
ACTIVITY IMPOSED BY AN ACCOUNT HOLDER UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(6) OF THIS
SECTION, THE ACCOUNT HOLDER MAY CONTINUE TO HAVE ACCESS TO THE ACCOUNT

HOUSE BILL 465
AND IS AUTHORIZED TO WITHDRAW FUNDS FROM THE ACCOUNT ON PROPER
APPLICATION TO THE SPORTS WAGERING LICENSEE.
9–1E–18.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION, “TRANSACTIONAL DATA AND METRICS” MEANS
DATA AND METRICS RELATING TO SPORTS WAGERING PARTICIPANTS IN THE STATE.
(2) “TRANSACTIONAL DATA AND METRICS” INCLUDES:
(I) ACCOUNT BANS AND SUSPENSIONS;
(II) COMPLAINTS BY SPORTS WAGERING PARTICIPANTS;
(III) DEMOGRAPHICS OF SPORTS WAGERING PARTICIPANTS;
(IV) THE GEOLOCATION OF SPORTS WAGERING PARTICIPANTS;
(V) THE USE AND UTILIZATION OF A SPORTS WAGERING
PLATFORM BY SPORTS WAGERING PARTICIPANTS; AND
(VI) FINANCIAL INFORMATION OF SPORTS WAGERING
PARTICIPANTS IN THE STATE, INCLUDING:
1. BALANCE STATEMENTS;
2. BET LEVEL OR AMOUNTS;
3. BONUS USAGE;
4. DEPOSITS; AND
5. WITHDRAWALS.
(B) (1) ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, A SPORTS WAGERING
LICENSEE SHALL PROVIDE ALL TRANSACTIONAL DATA AND METRICS RELATED TO
SPORTS WAGERING CONDUCTED IN THE STATE AND ACQUIRED BY AN ONLINE
SPORTS WAGERING OPERATOR OF THE LICENSEE ON A QUARTERLY BASIS TO
MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY, BOWIE STATE UNIVERSITY, AND THE UNIVERSITY OF
MARYLAND SCHOOL OF MEDICINE.
(2) THE INFORMATION PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:

HOUSE BILL 465 9
(I) THE NUMBER OF PARTICIPANTS THAT THE SPORTS
WAGERING LICENSEE HAS IDENTIFIED AS ENGAGING IN ERRATIC OR INCREASED
GAMBLING BEHAVIOR; AND
(II) THE NUMBER AND LENGTH OF ANY BANS OR SUSPENSIONS
IN RESPONSE TO THE BEHAVIOR DESCRIBED UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(C) THE TRANSACTIONAL DATA AND METRICS PROVIDED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION:
(1) SHALL EXCLUDE ANY PERSONALLY IDENTIFIABLE INFORMATION;
(2) ARE NOT SUBJECT TO DISCLOSURE UNDER THE PUBLIC
INFORMATION ACT; AND
(3) MAY BE DISCLOSED BY MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY, BOWIE
STATE UNIVERSITY, AND THE UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND SCHOOL OF MEDICINE:
(I) ONLY AS NECESSARY TO CONDUCT RESEARCH; OR
(II) AS PART OF A PREVALENCE STUDY OR PEER–REVIEWED
REPORT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.